Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 68.
ABORTION

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment, effective December 8, 1988, was proposed by initiative petition and adopted at the 1988, general election by a vote of 398,107 for and 368,117 against.

Enforcement of Amendment 68 is enjoined to the extent it prohibits the use of state funds to pay for abortions for Medicaid-eligible victims of rape or incest, for so long as federal law mandates Medicaid funding for abortions for Medicaid-eligible victims of rape or incest.

§ 1. Public funding.

No public funds will be used to pay for any abortion, except to save the mother's life.

§ 2. Public policy.

The policy of Arkansas is to protect the life of every unborn child from conception until birth, to the extent permitted by the Federal Constitution.

§ 3. Effect of amendment.

This amendment will not affect contraceptives or require an appropriation of public funds.